Mississippi, session 2026, SB2244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Any public school district which accepts a transfer student under Section 37-15-31 from a district rated in the last two (2) consecutive school years as an "F" under the State Department of Education's accountability model shall receive from the department the difference between the total funding formula amount for each public school student and the average per-pupil cost of the receiving district for a comparable student.  The receiving district shall submit such request to the department upon admission and enrollment of the student. (2)  The State Department of Education shall promulgate rules and regulations, including documentation requirements for the calculation of per-pupil cost, for implementing this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.